North Carolina, session 2025, HB767.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is established the Joint Legislative Commission on Market Rate
Compensation for Teachers to study and report on public school teacher compensation in North
Carolina as compared to other states nationwide.
SECTION 2. The Commission shall be composed of seven members as follows:
(1) Two members of the Senate, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate.
(2) Two members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives.
(3) Two members to be appointed by the Governor.
(4) The State Superintendent of Public Instruction, or the Superintendent's
designee.
SECTION 3. Vacancies on the Commission shall be filled by the appointing
authority. The Commission shall be chaired by a senator and a representative designated by the
appointing authority. A quorum of the Commission shall be four members. The Commission,
while in the discharge of its official duties, may exercise all powers provided for under
G.S. 120-19 and G.S. 120-19.1 through G.S. 120-19.4, including the power to request all
officers, agents, agencies, and departments of the State to provide any information, data, or
documents within their possession, ascertainable from their records, or otherwise available to
them.
SECTION 4. The Commission may meet at any time upon the call of the chairs. The
Commission may meet in the Legislative Building, the Legislative Office Building, or any other
location as agreed upon by the Commission. The Commission may contract for professional,
clerical, or consultant services as provided by G.S. 120-32.02.
SECTION 5. The Commission shall hold at least five public meetings in distinct
geographic regions of the State.
SECTION 6. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative
Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Commission in its work. The House
of Representatives' and Senate's Directors of Legislative Assistants shall assign clerical staff to
the Commission, and the expenses relating to the clerical employees shall be borne by the
Commission. Members of the Commission shall receive subsistence and travel expenses at the
rates set forth in G.S. 120-3.1, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate.
*H767-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7. The Commission shall study the following issues related to public
school teacher compensation in North Carolina:
(1) Starting and average salaries of public school teachers in North Carolina as
compared to other public school teachers in the United States and in the
southeastern region.
(2) A comparison of the benefits associated with employment as a public school
teacher in North Carolina as compared to other public school teachers in the
United States and in the southeastern region.
(3) The wage gap between public school teachers and other professionals with
similar education levels.
(4) Attrition rates of public school teachers in North Carolina, including how
many teachers leave for other professions and how many pursue education
careers outside of North Carolina public schools.
(5) The impact of State-funded salary supplements, bonuses, and loan forgiveness
programs on retention and recruitment for public school teachers in North
Carolina at the beginning, middle, and end of their careers.
(6) The impact of increasing local supplements and increasing county-level
funding for public schools through property taxes.
(7) Any other issue the Commission deems relevant to its study.
SECTION 8. The Commission may make an interim report, including any legislative
recommendations, to the 2025 General Assembly, 2026 Regular Session, prior to its convening
and shall submit a final report, including any legislative recommendations, by the end of the 2026
Regular Session of the General Assembly. The Commission shall terminate on December 31,
2026, or upon the filing of its final report, whichever occurs first.
SECTION 9. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 767-First Edition